Maryland, session 2026, HB1166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Dealer” means, except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection,
a dealer in vehicles of a type required to be registered under Title 13 of this article.
(2) (i) “Dealer” includes:
1. A person who is in the business of buying, selling, or
exchanging vehicles, including a person who during any 12–month period offers to sell three
or more of these vehicles, the ownership of which was acquired for resale purposes; and
2. For the purposes of §§ 15–301 through 15–315, inclusive,
of this title, any person who sells vehicles, whether or not that person acquired the vehicles
for personal or business use, if the vehicles are displayed at a fixed location used principally
for the purpose of selling vehicles on a regular basis.
(ii) 1. For the purposes of subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, a
person who offers to sell three or more vehicles during any 12–month period is presumed
to have acquired the vehicles for resale purposes.
2. The vehicle owner has the burden of rebutting the
presumption established under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(3) “Dealer” does not include:
(i) A public official who sells or disposes of vehicles in the
performance of his official duties;
(ii) An insurance company, finance company, bank, or other lending
institution licensed or otherwise authorized to do business in this State that, to save it from
loss, sells or disposes of vehicles under a contractual right and in the regular course of its
business;
(iii) A licensed auctioneer acting on behalf of a seller, secured party
or owner and where title does not pass to the auctioneer and the auction is not for the
purpose of avoiding the provisions of this title;

HOUSE BILL 1166 3
(iv) A receiver, trustee, personal representative, or other person
appointed by or acting under the authority of any court;
(v) Either a manufacturer or distributor who sells or distributes
vehicles to licensed dealers or a person employed by a manufacturer or distributor to
promote the sale of the vehicles of the manufacturer or distributor, if that manufacturer,
distributor, or person does not sell vehicles to retail buyers;
(vi) A person who sells or disposes of vehicles acquired and used for
personal or business use and not for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this title, if
that person is not engaged in buying, selling, or exchanging vehicles as a business;
(vii) An automotive dismantler and recycler who during the normal
course of business acquires a salvage vehicle and transfers the vehicle on a salvage
certificate. However, if the automotive dismantler and recycler rebuilds and sells more than
5 vehicles during a 12–month period to a person other than another automotive dismantler
and recycler or licensed dealer, the automotive dismantler and recycler must be licensed as
a dealer under § 15–302 of this title;
(viii) A person engaged in the leasing of motor vehicles under leases
not intended as security;
(ix) A religious, charitable, or volunteer organization exempt from
taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the Department of Human Services,
or a local department of social services transferring a vehicle under § 13–810 of this article;
or
(x) An autonomous vehicle converter as defined in § 15–901 of this
title.
15–305.
(e) (2) (i) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (f) of this section and
subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a manufacturer or distributor may be
licensed as a dealer if:
1. The manufacturer or distributor deals only in electric or
nonfossil–fuel burning vehicles;
2. No dealer in the State holds a franchise from the
manufacturer or distributor;
3. The manufacturer or distributor, or a subsidiary, an
affiliate, or a controlled entity of the manufacturer or distributor, does not hold a controlling
interest in another manufacturer or distributor, or a subsidiary, an affiliate, or a controlled
entity of the other manufacturer or distributor, that is licensed as a dealer under this
paragraph; and

HOUSE BILL 1166
4. No other manufacturer or distributor, or subsidiary,
affiliate, or controlled entity of the other manufacturer or distributor, that is licensed as a
dealer under this paragraph, holds a controlling interest in the manufacturer or distributor,
or a subsidiary, an affiliate, or a controlled entity of the manufacturer or distributor.
(ii) No more than four licenses may be issued under this paragraph.
(iii) The Administration shall adopt regulations to implement this
paragraph.
15–316.
(A) AFTER THE SALE, OR LEASE, OR EXCHANGE OF A NEW MOTOR VEHICLE
THAT WILL BE REGISTERED IN THE STATE AND FOR WHICH TWO REGISTRATION
PLATES ARE REQUIRED UNDER § 13–411 OF THIS ARTICLE, A DEALER MAY NOT
DELIVER THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO THE BUYER OR LESSEE UNLESS:
(1) THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS EQUIPPED WITH REGISTRATION PLATE
MOUNTING HARDWARE OR ANOTHER MECHANISM CAPABLE OF SECURELY
DISPLAYING THE REGISTRATION PLATE ON THE FRONT OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–411 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) THE PURCHASER OR LESSEE SIGNS A WRITTEN STATEMENT
ACKNOWLEDGING THAT:
(I) THE BUYER OR LESSEE DECLINED INSTALLATION OF
REGISTRATION PLATE MOUNTING HARDWARE OR ANOTHER PLATE DISPLAY
MECHANISM ON THE FRONT OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) THE BUYER OR LESSEE UNDERSTANDS THAT STATE LAW
REQUIRES THE DISPLAY OF A REGISTRATION PLATE ON THE FRONT OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE;
(III) REGISTRATION PLATE MOUNTING HARDWARE OR ANOTHER
PLATE DISPLAY MECHANISM FOR THE FRONT OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS AVAILABLE
FROM THE DEALER; AND
(IV) FAILURE TO DISPLAY A REGISTRATION PLATE ON THE
FRONT OF THE VEHICLE IS A MISDEMEANOR AND MAY SUBJECT THE BUYER OR
LESSEE TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500.
(B) ON A MONTHLY BASIS, A A DEALER SHALL REPORT SUBMIT EACH
WRITTEN STATEMENT SIGNED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION TO THE

HOUSE BILL 1166 5
ADMINISTRATION THE NAME OF EACH BUYER OR LESSEE WHO SIGNED A WRITTEN
STATEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION TOGETHER WITH THE DOCUMENTS REQUIRED
UNDER § 13–113 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR REGISTRATION OF THE VEHICLE THAT IS THE
SUBJECT OF THE STATEMENT.
(C) A DEALER WHO SUBMITS A SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE UNDER § 26–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE WITH RESPECT TO THE BUYER OR LESSEE WHO SIGNED THE
STATEMENT.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A WRITTEN STATEMENT FOR USE BY DEALERS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
PROCEDURES GOVERNING:
(I) THE SUBMISSION OF WRITTEN STATEMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE USE AND DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION CONTAINED IN
A WRITTEN STATEMENT, INCLUDING DISCLOSURE TO LAW ENFORCEMENT FOR
ENFORCEMENT OF § 13–411 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.